en: Dessert wines
fr: vins liquoreux
hr: Desertna vina
hu: Desszertborok
ja: デザートワイン
nl: Dessertwijnen, Dessertwijn

fr: vins moelleux
nl: Zachte wijnen, Zachte wijn

en: Flavoured wines
de: Aromatisierte Weine
es: Vinos aromatizados
fr: Vins aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirana vina
hu: Ízesített borok
it: Vini aromatizzati
nl: Gearomatiseerde wijnen, Gearomatiseerde wijn
pt: Vinhos aromatizados
ru: Ароматизированные вина

en: Non-alcoholic beverages
bg: Безалкохолни напитки
ca: Begudes sense alcohol
cs: Nealkoholické nápoje
da: Ikke-alkoholholdige drikkevarer
de: alkoholfreie Getränke
es: Bebidas no alcohólicas, Bebidas sin alcohol
fi: Alkoholittomat juomat
fr: Boissons sans alcool, boisson sans alcool
he: משקאות ללא אלכוהול
hr: Bezalkoholna pića
hu: Alkoholmentes italok
it: Bevande analcoliche
lt: Nealkoholiniai gėrimai
nl: Alcoholvrije dranken, Alcoholvrije drank
pl: Napoje bezalkoholowe
pt: Bebidas não alcoólicas
ro: Băuturi nealcoolice, Băuturi fără alcool
ru: Безалкогольные напитки
sv: Alkoholfria drycker
th: เครื่องดื่มไม่มีแอลกอฮอล์
tr: Alkolsüz içecekler
zh: 无酒精饮料

en: Non-alcoholic instant beverages variety packs
de: Alkoholfreie Getränke Mischpackungen - nicht trinkfertig
es: Packs variados de bebidas instantáneas sin alcohol
fr: Assortiments de Boissons non alcoolisées instantanés
hr: Razna pakiranja bezalkoholnih instant pića
hu: Alkaholmentes instant italválogatások
it: Confezioni miste di bevande non alcoliche istantanee
nl: Assortimenten van niet-alcoholische instantdranken
pt: Packs variados de bebidas não alcóolicas instantes
sv: Alkoholfria snabbdrycker olika förpackningar

en: Non-alcoholic beverages variety packs
de: Alkoholfreie Getränke Mischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de bebidas sin alcohol
fr: Assortiments de boissons non alcoolisées
hr: Raznovrsna pakiranja bezalkoholnih pića
hu: Alkaholmentes italválogatások
it: Confezioni miste di bevande non alcoliche
nl: Aassortimenten van alcoholvrije dranken
pt: Packs variados de bebidas não alcóolicas

en: Non-alcoholic ciders, Alcohol-free ciders
es: Sidras sin alcohol, Sidras no alcohólicas
fr: Cidres sans alcool, Cidres non alcoolisés
hr: Bezalkoholna jabukovača
hu: Alkoholmentes cider
lt: Nealkoholiniai sidrai, sidrai be alkoholio
nl: Alcoholvrije cider, Niet-alcoholische cider

en: Still soft drink with tea extract
de: Stillgetränk mit Teeextrakt
es: Bebida gaseosa sin gas con extracto de té
fr: Boisson au thé aromatisée
hr: Bezalkoholno piće s ekstraktom čaja
hu: Szénsavmentes üdítőital teakivonattal, Teakivonattal szénsavmentes üdítőital
nl: Koolzuurvrije frisdrank met thee-extract

en: Still soft drink with tea extract with sugar and artificial sweetener(s)
fr: Boisson au thé aromatisée sucrée avec édulcorants

en: Still soft drink with tea extract flavoured without sugar and with artificial sweeteners
fr: Boisson au thé aromatisée non sucrée avec édulcorants

en: Still soft drink with tea extract flavoured with sugar, Still soft drinks with tea extract and sugar and sweeteners
fr: Boisson au thé aromatisée sucrée

en: Mixed drinks, Mixed Beverages
de: Mischgetränk, Mix-Getränk
hr: Miješana pića
nl: Gemengde dranken

en: Flavoured syrups
bg: Ароматизирани сиропи
ca: Xarops aromatitzats
da: Sirupper med smag
de: Aromatisierte Sirups
es: Siropes aromatizados, Jarabes aromatizados
fi: maustetut siirapit
fr: Sirops aromatisés
hr: Aromatizirani sirupi
hu: Ízesített szirupok
it: Sciroppi aromatizzati
lt: Aromatizuoti sirupai
nl: Gearomatiseerde siropen, Gearomatiseerde Siroop, Limonadesiropen
pl: Syropy smakowe
pt: Xaropes aromatizados
sv: Siraper med smak

en: Sugar-free flavoured syrups, Flavoured syrups without sugar
de: zuckerfreie aromatisierte Sirups, aromatisierte Sirups ohne Zucker
fi: sokerittomat maustesiirapit
fr: Sirops aromatisés sans sucre, sirops sans sucre
hr: Aromatizirani sirupi bez šećera
hu: Cukormentes ízesített szirupok
nl: Suikervrije gearomatiseerde siropen
pl: Syropy smakowe bez cukru

en: Syrups with fruits, Syrup with fruits, Fruit syrups, Fruit syrup
de: Fruchtsirups, Frucht-Sirup
es: Jarabes con frutas, Jarabe con frutas, Sirope de frutas
fi: hedelmäsiirapit
fr: Sirops aux fruits, sirop aux fruits, Sirops de fruits, sirop de fruits
he: סירופים מפירות
hr: Sirupi s voćem, Voćni sirupi
hu: Gyümölcsös szirupok
it: Sciroppi con frutta, Sciroppo con frutta, Sciroppi alla frutta
lt: Vaisiniai sirupai
nl: Vruchtensiropen, Vruchtensiroop, Vruchtesiroop, Fruitsiropen
pl: Syropy owocowe, Syropy z owocami
pt: Xaropes com frutas, Xarope com frutas

en: Orgeat syrups
de: Mandelsirups
es: Jarabes de orgeat
fr: Sirops d’orgeat, sirop d'orgeat
hr: Orgeat sirupi
it: Sciroppi di orzata
nl: Amandelsiropen, Amandelsiroop
pt: Xaropes de orgeat

en: Apple syrups
de: Apfelsirups
fr: Sirops de pomme
hr: Sirupi od jabuka
hu: Almaszirup
lt: Obuolių sirupai
nl: Appelsiropen, Appelsiroop
pl: Syropy jabłkowe

en: Orange syrups
de: Orangensirups
fr: Sirops d'orange
hr: Narančasti sirupi
hu: Narancsszirup
lt: Apelsinų sirupai
nl: Sinaasappelsiropen, Sinaasappelsiroop
pl: Syropy pomarańczowe
pt: Xaropes de laranja

en: Watermelon syrups
de: Wassermelonensirups
fr: Sirops de pastèque
hr: Sirupi od lubenice
hu: Dinnyeszirup
it: Sciroppi di angurie
lt: Arbūzų sirupai
nl: Watermeloensiropen, Watermeloensiroop
pl: Syropy arbuzowe

en: Grapefruit syrups
de: Grapefruitsirups
fr: Sirops de pamplemousse, Sirops de pamplemousses
hr: Sirupi od grejpa
nl: Grapefruitsiropen, Grapefruitsiroop